South Dakota, session 2026, HB1040.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 25-7-6.2 be AMENDED:
25-7-6.2. The child support obligation must be established in accordance with the
following schedule, subject to the revisions or deviations as permitted by this chapter.
Except as provided in this chapter, the combined monthly net incomes of both parents
must be used in determining the obligation to be divided proportionately between the
parents based upon their respective net incomes. The noncustodial parent's proportionate
share establishes the amount of the child support order.
The emboldened areas of the schedule include a self-support reserve of eight
hundred seventy-one one thousand one hundred forty-eight dollars per month that
accounts for the subsistence needs of the obligated parent with a limited ability to pay. If
the obligation using only the noncustodial parent's monthly net income is an obligation
within the emboldened areas of the schedule, that amount must be compared to the
noncustodial parent's proportionate share using both parents' monthly net incomes. The
lesser amount establishes the noncustodial parent's child support order. A noncustodial
parent who is incarcerated for more than one hundred eighty days is obligated to no less
than the minimum base obligation amount established in the schedule.
The share of the custodial parent is presumed to be spent directly for the benefit
of the child.
Monthly Net One Two Three Four Five Six
Income Child Children Children Children Children Children
0-950 79 79 79 79 79 79
951-1,000 129 129 129 129 129 129
1,001-1,050 179 179 179 179 179 179
1,051-1,100 225 229 229 229 229 229
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.584.9 2 1040
1,101-1,150 266 279 279 279 279 279
1,151-1,200 308 329 329 329 329 329
1,201-1,250 320 379 379 379 379 379
1,251-1,300 333 429 429 429 429 429
1,301-1,350 345 479 479 479 479 479
1,351-1,400 357 523 529 529 529 529
1,401-1,450 370 541 579 579 579 579
1,451-1,500 382 559 629 629 629 629
1,501-1,550 395 577 679 679 679 679
1,551-1,600 407 595 706 729 729 729
1,601-1,650 419 613 727 779 779 779
1,651-1,700 431 629 747 829 829 829
1,701-1,750 443 646 766 855 879 879
1,751-1,800 455 663 785 877 929 929
1,801-1,850 466 679 804 899 979 979
1,851-1,900 478 696 824 920 1012 1029
1,901-1,950 490 713 843 942 1039 1079
1,951-2,000 501 729 862 963 1063 1129
2,001-2,050 513 746 882 985 1086 1177
2,051-2,100 525 763 901 1006 1110 1219
2,101-2,150 536 779 920 1028 1134 1245
2,151-2,200 548 796 939 1049 1157 1271
2,201-2,250 560 813 959 1071 1181 1297
2,251-2,300 572 829 978 1092 1205 1322
2,301-2,350 583 846 998 1115 1246 1348
2,351-2,400 595 862 1020 1139 1272 1374
2,401-2,450 607 879 1041 1163 1299 1400
2,451-2,500 618 896 1062 1186 1325 1425
2,501-2,550 630 912 1083 1210 1352 1477
2,551-2,600 642 929 1105 1234 1378 1527
2,601-2,650 653 946 1126 1258 1405 1569
2,651-2,700 665 962 1147 1281 1431 1599
2,701-2,750 677 979 1168 1305 1458 1628
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.584.9 3 1040
2,751-2,800 688 996 1190 1329 1484 1658
2,801-2,850 700 1012 1211 1353 1511 1688
2,851-2,900 712 1029 1232 1376 1537 1717
2,901-2,950 723 1046 1253 1400 1564 1747
2,951-3,000 735 1062 1275 1424 1590 1776
3,001-3,050 746 1079 1296 1447 1617 1806
3,051-3,100 758 1096 1317 1471 1643 1836
3,101-3,150 770 1114 1338 1495 1670 1865
3,151-3,200 781 1129 1356 1515 1692 1890
3,201-3,250 793 1146 1373 1533 1713 1913
3,251-3,300 805 1162 1389 1551 1733 1935
3,301-3,350 816 1179 1405 1569 1753 1958
3,351-3,400 821 1185 1421 1587 1773 1981
3,401-3,450 824 1198 1437 1605 1793 2003
3,451-3,500 828 1212 1453 1624 1813 2026
3,501-3,550 831 1226 1470 1642 1834 2048
3,551-3,600 834 1240 1485 1659 1853 2070
3,601-3,650 842 1251 1499 1675 1871 2089
3,651-3,700 852 1263 1513 1690 1888 2109
3,701-3,750 861 1274 1527 1705 1905 2128
3,751-3,800 869 1286 1540 1721 1922 2147
3,801-3,850 876 1297 1554 1736 1939 2166
3,851-3,900 880 1309 1568 1751 1956 2185
3,901-3,950 883 1320 1582 1767 1974 2205
3,951-4,000 889 1332 1596 1782 1991 2224
4,001-4,050 897 1340 1605 1792 2002 2236
4,051-4,100 906 1347 1612 1800 2011 2246
4,101-4,150 915 1353 1619 1808 2019 2256
4,151-4,200 924 1360 1626 1816 2028 2265
4,201-4,250 929 1366 1633 1824 2037 2275
4,251-4,300 932 1373 1640 1831 2046 2285
4,301-4,350 936 1379 1647 1839 2054 2295
4,351-4,400 939 1386 1654 1847 2063 2304
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.584.9 4 1040
4,401-4,450 943 1392 1660 1854 2071 2313
4,451-4,500 946 1397 1665 1859 2077 2320
4,501-4,550 951 1402 1669 1865 2083 2326
4,551-4,600 954 1407 1674 1870 2089 2333
4,601-4,650 958 1411 1679 1875 2094 2339
4,651-4,700 961 1416 1683 1880 2100 2346
4,701-4,750 965 1421 1688 1885 2106 2352
4,751-4,800 969 1426 1693 1891 2112 2359
4,801-4,850 973 1430 1697 1896 2118 2366
4,851-4,900 978 1437 1704 1904 2126 2375
4,901-4,950 981 1443 1712 1912 2136 2385
4,951-5,000 985 1449 1719 1920 2145 2396
5,001-5,050 989 1456 1726 1928 2154 2406
5,051-5,100 993 1462 1734 1937 2163 2416
5,101-5,150 996 1469 1741 1945 2172 2426
5,151-5,200 1000 1475 1748 1953 2182 2437
5,201-5,250 1005 1481 1756 1961 2191 2447
5,251-5,300 1009 1488 1763 1969 2200 2457
5,301-5,350 1012 1495 1770 1978 2209 2467
5,351-5,400 1016 1502 1778 1986 2218 2478
5,401-5,450 1020 1509 1785 1994 2227 2488
5,451-5,500 1024 1516 1792 2002 2236 2498
5,501-5,550 1028 1523 1800 2010 2245 2508
5,551-5,600 1032 1530 1807 2018 2254 2518
5,601-5,650 1036 1537 1814 2026 2263 2528
5,651-5,700 1040 1544 1821 2035 2273 2538
5,701-5,750 1045 1552 1829 2043 2282 2549
5,751-5,800 1051 1560 1837 2052 2292 2561
5,801-5,850 1058 1568 1845 2061 2302 2572
5,851-5,900 1064 1577 1853 2070 2312 2583
5,901-5,950 1071 1585 1861 2079 2322 2594
5,951-6,000 1077 1593 1869 2088 2332 2605
6,001-6,050 1084 1601 1877 2097 2342 2616
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.584.9 5 1040
6,051-6,100 1090 1610 1885 2106 2352 2627
6,101-6,150 1097 1619 1896 2118 2366 2642
6,151-6,200 1104 1631 1910 2134 2383 2662
6,201-6,250 1112 1642 1924 2149 2401 2681
6,251-6,300 1119 1654 1938 2165 2418 2701
6,301-6,350 1126 1665 1952 2180 2436 2720
6,351-6,400 1134 1676 1966 2196 2453 2740
6,401-6,450 1141 1688 1980 2212 2470 2759
6,451-6,500 1149 1699 1994 2227 2488 2779
6,501-6,550 1156 1711 2008 2243 2505 2798
6,551-6,600 1156 1711 2010 2245 2507 2801
6,601-6,650 1156 1712 2011 2247 2510 2803
6,651-6,700 1156 1713 2013 2249 2512 2806
6,701-6,750 1156 1714 2015 2251 2514 2808
6,751-6,800 1157 1715 2017 2253 2516 2811
6,801-6,850 1157 1715 2018 2255 2518 2813
6,851-6,900 1162 1716 2020 2257 2521 2816
6,901-6,950 1167 1717 2022 2259 2523 2818
6,951-7,000 1172 1722 2027 2264 2529 2825
7,001-7,050 1177 1729 2034 2272 2538 2835
7,051-7,100 1182 1737 2041 2280 2547 2845
7,101-7,150 1187 1745 2049 2288 2556 2855
7,151-7,200 1192 1753 2056 2297 2565 2865
7,201-7,250 1197 1761 2063 2305 2574 2876
7,251-7,300 1202 1768 2071 2313 2583 2886
7,301-7,350 1207 1776 2078 2321 2593 2896
7,351-7,400 1212 1784 2085 2329 2602 2906
7,401-7,450 1216 1791 2093 2337 2611 2916
7,451-7,500 1221 1798 2100 2346 2620 2927
7,501-7,550 1226 1805 2107 2354 2629 2937
7,551-7,600 1231 1812 2115 2362 2639 2947
7,601-7,650 1237 1819 2122 2370 2648 2958
7,651-7,700 1242 1826 2130 2379 2657 2968
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.584.9 6 1040
7,701-7,750 1247 1834 2137 2387 2666 2978
7,751-7,800 1253 1841 2144 2395 2675 2988
7,801-7,850 1258 1848 2152 2403 2685 2999
7,851-7,900 1263 1855 2159 2412 2694 3009
7,901-7,950 1268 1862 2166 2420 2703 3019
7,951-8,000 1274 1869 2174 2428 2712 3030
8,001-8,050 1279 1876 2182 2437 2722 3041
8,051-8,100 1285 1884 2191 2447 2733 3053
8,101-8,150 1290 1892 2200 2457 2745 3066
8,151-8,200 1296 1900 2209 2467 2756 3078
8,201-8,250 1302 1908 2218 2477 2767 3090
8,251-8,300 1307 1916 2226 2487 2778 3103
8,301-8,350 1313 1924 2235 2497 2789 3115
8,351-8,400 1319 1932 2244 2507 2800 3128
8,401-8,450 1324 1940 2253 2517 2811 3140
8,451-8,500 1330 1948 2262 2527 2822 3153
8,501-8,550 1336 1956 2271 2537 2833 3165
8,551-8,600 1341 1964 2280 2547 2845 3177
8,601-8,650 1347 1972 2289 2557 2856 3190
8,651-8,700 1352 1980 2298 2566 2867 3202
8,701-8,750 1358 1988 2307 2576 2878 3215
8,751-8,800 1364 1996 2315 2586 2889 3227
8,801-8,850 1369 2004 2324 2596 2900 3239
8,851-8,900 1375 2012 2333 2606 2911 3252
8,901-8,950 1381 2020 2342 2616 2922 3264
8,951-9,000 1386 2028 2351 2626 2933 3277
9,001-9,050 1392 2036 2360 2636 2944 3289
9,051-9,100 1397 2044 2369 2646 2956 3301
9,101-9,150 1403 2052 2378 2656 2967 3314
9,151-9,200 1409 2060 2387 2666 2978 3326
9,201-9,250 1414 2068 2396 2676 2989 3339
9,251-9,300 1420 2076 2404 2686 3000 3351
9,301-9,350 1426 2084 2413 2696 3011 3363
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.584.9 7 1040
9,351-9,400 1431 2092 2422 2706 3022 3376
9,401-9,450 1437 2100 2431 2716 3033 3388
9,451-9,500 1443 2107 2440 2726 3044 3401
9,501-9,550 1447 2115 2449 2736 3056 3414
9,551-9,600 1452 2123 2459 2747 3068 3427
9,601-9,650 1457 2130 2468 2757 3080 3440
9,651-9,700 1462 2138 2478 2768 3092 3453
9,701-9,750 1466 2145 2487 2778 3103 3466
9,751-9,800 1471 2153 2497 2789 3115 3480
9,801-9,850 1476 2160 2506 2799 3127 3493
9,851-9,900 1481 2168 2516 2810 3139 3506
9,901-9,950 1485 2175 2525 2821 3151 3519
9,951-10,000 1490 2183 2535 2831 3162 3532
10,001-10,050 1495 2190 2544 2842 3174 3546
10,051-10,100 1500 2198 2554 2852 3186 3559
10,101-10,150 1505 2205 2563 2863 3198 3572
10,151-10,200 1509 2213 2572 2873 3210 3585
10,201-10,250 1514 2221 2582 2884 3221 3598
10,251-10,300 1519 2228 2591 2895 3233 3612
10,301-10,350 1524 2236 2601 2905 3245 3625
10,351-10,400 1528 2243 2610 2916 3257 3638
10,401-10,450 1533 2251 2620 2926 3269 3651
10,451-10,500 1538 2258 2629 2937 3281 3664
10,501-10,550 1543 2266 2639 2947 3292 3678
10,551-10,600 1547 2273 2648 2958 3304 3691
10,601-10,650 1552 2281 2658 2969 3316 3704
10,651-10,700 1557 2288 2667 2979 3328 3717
10,701-10,750 1562 2296 2677 2990 3340 3730
10,751-10,800 1566 2303 2686 3000 3351 3743
10,801-10,850 1571 2311 2696 3011 3363 3757
10,851-10,900 1576 2318 2705 3021 3375 3770
10,901-10,950 1581 2326 2714 3032 3387 3783
10,951-11,000 1585 2333 2724 3043 3399 3796
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.584.9 8 1040
11,001-11,050 1590 2341 2733 3053 3410 3809
11,051-11,100 1595 2349 2743 3064 3422 3823
11,101-11,150 1600 2356 2752 3074 3434 3836
11,151-11,200 1604 2364 2762 3085 3446 3849
11,201-11,250 1609 2371 2771 3095 3458 3862
11,251-11,300 1614 2379 2781 3106 3469 3875
11,301-11,350 1619 2386 2790 3117 3481 3889
11,351-11,400 1623 2394 2800 3127 3493 3902
11,401-11,450 1628 2401 2809 3138 3505 3915
11,451-11,500 1633 2409 2819 3148 3517 3928
11,501-11,550 1638 2416 2828 3159 3528 3941
11,551-11,600 1642 2424 2837 3169 3540 3954
11,601-11,650 1649 2431 2847 3180 3552 3968
11,651-11,700 1656 2439 2856 3190 3564 3981
11,701-11,750 1663 2446 2866 3201 3576 3994
11,751-11,800 1670 2454 2875 3211 3587 4007
11,801-11,850 1677 2462 2885 3222 3599 4020
11,851-11,900 1684 2469 2894 3232 3611 4033
11,901-11,950 1691 2477 2903 3243 3622 4046
11,951-12,000 1698 2484 2913 3254 3634 4059
12,001-12,050 1705 2492 2922 3264 3646 4072
12,051-12,100 1712 2499 2932 3275 3658 4086
12,101-12,150 1719 2507 2941 3285 3669 4099
12,151-12,200 1726 2514 2950 3296 3681 4112
12,201-12,250 1733 2522 2960 3306 3693 4125
12,251-12,300 1741 2529 2969 3317 3705 4138
12,301-12,350 1748 2537 2979 3327 3716 4151
12,351-12,400 1755 2544 2988 3338 3728 4164
12,401-12,450 1762 2552 2997 3348 3740 4177
12,451-12,500 1769 2559 3007 3359 3751 4190
12,501-12,550 1776 2567 3016 3369 3763 4204
12,551-12,600 1783 2574 3026 3380 3775 4217
12,601-12,650 1790 2582 3035 3390 3787 4230
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.584.9 9 1040
12,651-12,700 1797 2590 3044 3401 3798 4243
12,701-12,750 1804 2597 3054 3411 3810 4256
12,751-12,800 1811 2605 3063 3422 3822 4269
12,801-12,850 1818 2612 3073 3432 3834 4282
12,851-12,900 1825 2620 3082 3443 3845 4295
12,901-12,950 1833 2627 3091 3453 3857 4308
12,951-13,000 1840 2635 3101 3464 3869 4321
13,001-13,050 1847 2642 3110 3474 3881 4335
13,051-13,100 1854 2650 3120 3485 3892 4348
13,101-13,150 1861 2657 3129 3495 3904 4361
13,151-13,200 1868 2665 3138 3506 3916 4374
13,201-13,250 1875 2672 3148 3516 3927 4387
13,251-13,300 1882 2680 3157 3527 3939 4400
13,301-13,350 1889 2687 3167 3537 3951 4413
13,351-13,400 1896 2695 3176 3548 3963 4426
13,401-13,450 1903 2703 3185 3558 3974 4439
13,451-13,500 1910 2710 3195 3569 3986 4452
13,501-13,550 1917 2718 3204 3579 3998 4466
13,551-13,600 1925 2725 3214 3590 4010 4479
13,601-13,650 1932 2733 3223 3600 4021 4492
13,651-13,700 1939 2740 3232 3611 4033 4505
13,701-13,750 1945 2748 3241 3621 4044 4517
13,751-13,800 1950 2755 3250 3630 4055 4529
13,801-13,850 1955 2763 3258 3639 4065 4541
13,851-13,900 1960 2770 3266 3649 4076 4552
13,901-13,950 1965 2778 3275 3658 4086 4564
13,951-14,000 1970 2786 3283 3667 4096 4576
14,001-14,050 1975 2793 3291 3677 4107 4587
14,051-14,100 1980 2801 3300 3686 4117 4599
14,101-14,150 1985 2808 3308 3695 4128 4610
14,151-14,200 1990 2816 3316 3704 4138 4622
14,201-14,250 1996 2823 3325 3714 4148 4634
14,251-14,300 2001 2831 3333 3723 4159 4645
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.584.9 10 1040
14,301-14,350 2006 2839 3341 3732 4169 4657
14,351-14,400 2011 2846 3350 3742 4180 4669
14,401-14,450 2016 2854 3358 3751 4190 4680
14,451-14,500 2021 2861 3366 3760 4200 4692
14,501-14,550 2026 2869 3375 3770 4211 4703
14,551-14,600 2031 2876 3383 3779 4221 4715
14,601-14,650 2036 2884 3392 3788 4232 4727
14,651-14,700 2041 2892 3400 3798 4242 4738
14,701-14,750 2046 2899 3408 3807 4252 4750
14,751-14,800 2051 2907 3417 3816 4263 4761
14,801-14,850 2056 2914 3425 3826 4273 4773
14,851-14,900 2061 2922 3433 3835 4284 4785
14,901-14,950 2066 2929 3442 3844 4294 4796
14,951-15,000 2071 2937 3450 3853 4304 4808
15,001-15,050 2076 2945 3458 3863 4315 4820
15,051-15,100 2081 2952 3467 3872 4325 4831
15,101-15,150 2086 2960 3475 3881 4336 4843
15,151-15,200 2091 2967 3483 3891 4346 4854
15,201-15,250 2097 2975 3492 3900 4356 4866
15,251-15,300 2102 2982 3500 3909 4367 4878
15,301-15,350 2107 2990 3508 3919 4377 4889
15,351-15,400 2112 2998 3517 3928 4388 4901
15,401-15,450 2117 3005 3525 3937 4398 4913
15,451-15,500 2122 3013 3533 3947 4408 4924
15,501-15,550 2127 3020 3542 3956 4419 4936
15,551-15,600 2132 3028 3550 3965 4429 4947
15,601-15,650 2137 3035 3558 3975 4440 4959
15,651-15,700 2142 3043 3567 3984 4450 4971
15,701-15,750 2147 3051 3575 3993 4460 4982
15,751-15,800 2152 3058 3583 4002 4471 4994
15,801-15,850 2157 3066 3592 4012 4481 5005
15,851-15,900 2162 3073 3600 4021 4492 5017
15,901-15,950 2167 3081 3608 4030 4502 5029
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.584.9 11 1040
15,951-16,000 2172 3088 3617 4040 4512 5040
16,001-16,050 2177 3096 3625 4049 4523 5052
16,051-16,100 2182 3104 3633 4058 4533 5064
16,101-16,150 2187 3111 3642 4068 4544 5075
16,151-16,200 2192 3119 3650 4077 4554 5087
16,201-16,250 2197 3126 3658 4086 4564 5098
16,251-16,300 2203 3134 3667 4096 4575 5110
16,301-16,350 2208 3141 3675 4105 4585 5122
16,351-16,400 2213 3149 3683 4114 4596 5133
16,401-16,450 2218 3157 3692 4124 4606 5145
16,451-16,500 2223 3164 3700 4133 4616 5157
16,501-16,550 2228 3172 3708 4142 4627 5168
16,551-16,600 2233 3179 3717 4151 4637 5180
16,601-16,650 2238 3187 3725 4161 4648 5191
16,651-16,700 2243 3194 3733 4170 4658 5203
16,701-16,750 2248 3202 3742 4179 4668 5215
16,751-16,800 2253 3210 3750 4189 4679 5226
16,801-16,850 2258 3217 3758 4198 4689 5238
16,851-16,900 2263 3225 3767 4207 4700 5249
16,901-16,950 2268 3232 3775 4217 4710 5261
16,951-17,000 2273 3240 3783 4226 4720 5273
17,001-17,050 2278 3247 3792 4235 4731 5284
17,051-17,100 2283 3255 3800 4245 4741 5296
17,101-17,150 2288 3262 3808 4254 4752 5308
17,151-17,200 2293 3270 3817 4263 4762 5319
17,201-17,250 2298 3278 3825 4273 4772 5331
17,251-17,300 2303 3285 3833 4282 4783 5342
17,301-17,350 2309 3293 3842 4291 4793 5354
17,351-17,400 2314 3300 3850 4300 4804 5366
17,401-17,450 2319 3308 3858 4310 4814 5377
17,451-17,500 2324 3315 3867 4319 4824 5389
17,501-17,550 2329 3323 3875 4328 4835 5400
17,551-17,600 2334 3331 3883 4338 4845 5412
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.584.9 12 1040
17,601-17,650 2339 3338 3892 4347 4856 5424
17,651-17,700 2344 3346 3900 4356 4866 5435
17,701-17,750 2349 3353 3908 4366 4876 5447
17,751-17,800 2354 3361 3917 4375 4887 5459
17,801-17,850 2359 3368 3925 4384 4897 5470
17,851-17,900 2364 3376 3933 4394 4908 5482
17,901-17,950 2369 3384 3942 4403 4918 5493
17,951-18,000 2374 3391 3950 4412 4928 5505
18,001-18,050 2379 3399 3958 4422 4939 5517
18,051-18,100 2384 3406 3967 4431 4949 5528
18,101-18,150 2389 3414 3975 4440 4960 5540
18,151-18,200 2394 3421 3983 4449 4970 5552
18,201-18,250 2399 3429 3992 4459 4980 5563
18,251-18,300 2404 3437 4000 4468 4991 5575
18,301-18,350 2410 3444 4008 4477 5001 5586
18,351-18,400 2415 3452 4017 4487 5012 5598
18,401-18,450 2420 3459 4025 4496 5022 5610
18,451-18,500 2425 3467 4033 4505 5032 5621
18,501-18,550 2430 3474 4042 4515 5043 5633
18,551-18,600 2435 3482 4050 4524 5053 5644
18,601-18,650 2440 3490 4058 4533 5064 5656
18,651-18,700 2445 3497 4067 4543 5074 5668
18,701-18,750 2450 3505 4075 4552 5084 5679
18,751-18,800 2455 3512 4083 4561 5095 5691
18,801-18,850 2460 3520 4092 4571 5105 5703
18,851-18,900 2465 3527 4100 4580 5116 5714
18,901-18,950 2470 3535 4108 4589 5126 5726
18,951-19,000 2475 3543 4117 4598 5136 5737
19,001-19,050 2480 3550 4125 4608 5147 5749
19,051-19,100 2485 3558 4133 4617 5157 5761
19,101-19,150 2490 3565 4142 4626 5168 5772
19,151-19,200 2495 3573 4150 4636 5178 5784
19,201-19,250 2500 3580 4158 4645 5188 5796
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.584.9 13 1040
19,251-19,300 2505 3588 4167 4654 5199 5807
19,301-19,350 2510 3596 4175 4664 5209 5819
19,351-19,400 2516 3603 4183 4673 5220 5830
19,401-19,450 2521 3611 4192 4682 5230 5842
19,451-19,500 2526 3618 4200 4692 5240 5854
19,501-19,550 2531 3626 4208 4701 5251 5865
19,551-19,600 2536 3633 4217 4710 5261 5877
19,601-19,650 2541 3641 4225 4719 5272 5888
19,651-19,700 2546 3649 4233 4729 5282 5900
19,701-19,750 2551 3656 4242 4738 5292 5912
19,751-19,800 2556 3664 4250 4747 5303 5923
19,801-19,850 2561 3671 4259 4757 5313 5935
19,851-19,900 2566 3679 4267 4766 5324 5947
19,901-19,950 2571 3686 4275 4775 5334 5958
19,951-20,000 2576 3694 4284 4785 5344 5970
20,001-20,050 2581 3702 4292 4794 5355 5981
20,051-20,100 2586 3709 4300 4803 5365 5993
20,101-20,150 2591 3717 4309 4813 5376 6005
20,151-20,200 2596 3724 4317 4822 5386 6016
20,201-20,250 2601 3732 4325 4831 5396 6028
20,251-20,300 2606 3739 4334 4841 5407 6040
20,301-20,350 2611 3747 4342 4850 5417 6051
20,351-20,400 2617 3755 4350 4859 5428 6063
20,401-20,450 2622 3762 4359 4868 5438 6074
20,451-20,500 2627 3770 4367 4878 5449 6086
20,501-20,550 2632 3777 4375 4887 5459 6098
20,551-20,600 2637 3785 4384 4896 5469 6109
20,601-20,650 2642 3792 4392 4906 5480 6121
20,651-20,700 2647 3800 4400 4915 5490 6132
20,701-20,750 2652 3808 4409 4924 5501 6144
20,751-20,800 2657 3815 4417 4934 5511 6156
20,801-20,850 2662 3823 4425 4943 5521 6167
20,851-20,900 2667 3830 4434 4952 5532 6179
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.584.9 14 1040
20,901-20,950 2672 3838 4442 4962 5542 6191
20,951-21,000 2677 3845 4450 4971 5553 6202
21,001-21,050 2682 3853 4459 4980 5563 6214
21,051-21,100 2687 3861 4467 4990 5573 6225
21,101-21,150 2692 3868 4475 4999 5584 6237
21,151-21,200 2697 3876 4484 5008 5594 6249
21,201-21,250 2702 3883 4492 5017 5605 6260
21,251-21,300 2707 3891 4500 5027 5615 6272
21,301-21,350 2712 3898 4509 5036 5625 6283
21,351-21,400 2717 3906 4517 5045 5636 6295
21,401-21,450 2723 3914 4525 5055 5646 6307
21,451-21,500 2728 3921 4534 5064 5657 6318
21,501-21,550 2733 3929 4542 5073 5667 6330
21,551-21,600 2738 3936 4550 5083 5677 6342
21,601-21,650 2743 3944 4559 5092 5688 6353
21,651-21,700 2748 3951 4567 5101 5698 6365
21,701-21,750 2753 3959 4575 5111 5709 6376
21,751-21,800 2758 3967 4584 5120 5719 6388
21,801-21,850 2763 3974 4592 5129 5729 6400
21,851-21,900 2768 3982 4600 5139 5740 6411
21,901-21,950 2773 3989 4609 5148 5750 6423
21,951-22,000 2778 3997 4617 5157 5761 6435
22,001-22,050 2783 4004 4625 5166 5771 6446
22,051-22,100 2788 4012 4634 5176 5781 6458
22,101-22,150 2793 4020 4642 5185 5792 6469
22,151-22,200 2798 4027 4650 5194 5802 6481
22,201-22,250 2803 4035 4659 5204 5813 6493
22,251-22,300 2808 4042 4667 5213 5823 6504
22,301-22,350 2813 4050 4675 5222 5833 6516
22,351-22,400 2818 4057 4684 5232 5844 6527
22,401-22,450 2823 4065 4692 5241 5854 6539
22,451-22,500 2829 4072 4700 5250 5865 6551
22,501-22,550 2834 4080 4709 5260 5875 6562
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.584.9 15 1040
22,551-22,600 2839 4088 4717 5269 5885 6574
22,601-22,650 2844 4095 4725 5278 5896 6586
22,651-22,700 2849 4103 4734 5288 5906 6597
22,701-22,750 2854 4110 4742 5297 5917 6609
22,751-22,800 2859 4118 4750 5306 5927 6620
22,801-22,850 2864 4125 4759 5315 5937 6632
22,851-22,900 2869 4133 4767 5325 5948 6644
22,901-22,950 2874 4141 4775 5334 5958 6655
22,951-23,000 2879 4148 4784 5343 5969 6667
23,001-23,050 2884 4156 4792 5353 5979 6679
23,051-23,100 2889 4163 4800 5362 5989 6690
23,101-23,150 2894 4171 4809 5371 6000 6702
23,151-23,200 2899 4178 4817 5381 6010 6713
23,201-23,250 2904 4186 4825 5390 6021 6725
23,251-23,300 2909 4194 4834 5399 6031 6737
23,301-23,350 2914 4201 4842 5409 6041 6748
23,351-23,400 2919 4209 4850 5418 6052 6760
23,401-23,450 2924 4216 4859 5427 6062 6771
23,451-23,500 2930 4224 4867 5437 6073 6783
23,501-23,550 2935 4231 4875 5446 6083 6795
23,551-23,600 2940 4239 4884 5455 6093 6806
23,601-23,650 2945 4247 4892 5464 6104 6818
23,651-23,700 2950 4254 4900 5474 6114 6830
23,701-23,750 2955 4262 4909 5483 6125 6841
23,751-23,800 2960 4269 4917 5492 6135 6853
23,801-23,850 2965 4277 4925 5502 6145 6864
23,851-23,900 2970 4284 4934 5511 6156 6876
23,901-23,950 2975 4292 4942 5520 6166 6888
23,951-24,000 2980 4300 4950 5530 6177 6899
24,001-24,050 2985 4307 4959 5539 6187 6911
24,051-24,100 2990 4315 4967 5548 6197 6923
24,101-24,150 2995 4322 4975 5558 6208 6934
24,151-24,200 3000 4330 4984 5567 6218 6946
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.584.9 16 1040
24,201-24,250 3005 4337 4992 5576 6229 6957
24,251-24,300 3010 4345 5000 5586 6239 6969
24,301-24,350 3015 4353 5009 5595 6249 6981
24,351-24,400 3020 4360 5017 5604 6260 6992
24,401-24,450 3025 4368 5025 5613 6270 7004
24,451-24,500 3030 4375 5034 5623 6281 7015
24,501-24,550 3036 4383 5042 5632 6291 7027
24,551-24,600 3041 4390 5050 5641 6301 7039
24,601-24,650 3046 4398 5059 5651 6312 7050
24,651-24,700 3051 4406 5067 5660 6322 7062
24,701-24,750 3056 4413 5075 5669 6333 7074
24,751-24,800 3061 4421 5084 5679 6343 7085
24,801-24,850 3066 4428 5092 5688 6353 7097
24,851-24,900 3071 4436 5100 5697 6364 7108
24,901-24,950 3076 4443 5109 5707 6374 7120
24,951-25,000 3081 4451 5117 5716 6385 7132
25,001-25,050 3086 4459 5126 5725 6395 7143
25,051-25,100 3091 4466 5134 5734 6405 7155
25,101-25,150 3096 4474 5142 5744 6416 7166
25,151-25,200 3101 4481 5151 5753 6426 7178
25,201-25,250 3106 4489 5159 5762 6437 7190
25,251-25,300 3111 4496 5167 5772 6447 7201
25,301-25,350 3116 4504 5176 5781 6457 7213
25,351-25,400 3121 4512 5184 5790 6468 7225
25,401-25,450 3126 4519 5192 5800 6478 7236
25,451-25,500 3131 4527 5201 5809 6489 7248
25,501-25,550 3136 4534 5209 5818 6499 7259
25,551-25,600 3142 4542 5217 5828 6509 7271
25,601-25,650 3147 4549 5226 5837 6520 7283
25,651-25,700 3152 4557 5234 5846 6530 7294
25,701-25,750 3157 4565 5242 5856 6541 7306
25,751-25,800 3162 4572 5251 5865 6551 7318
25,801-25,850 3167 4580 5259 5874 6561 7329
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.584.9 17 1040
25,851-25,900 3172 4587 5267 5883 6572 7341
25,901-25,950 3177 4595 5276 5893 6582 7352
25,951-26,000 3182 4602 5284 5902 6593 7364
26,001-26,050 3187 4610 5292 5911 6603 7376
26,051-26,100 3192 4618 5301 5921 6613 7387
26,101-26,150 3197 4625 5309 5930 6624 7399
26,151-26,200 3202 4633 5317 5939 6634 7410
26,201-26,250 3207 4640 5326 5949 6645 7422
26,251-26,300 3212 4648 5334 5958 6655 7434
26,301-26,350 3217 4655 5342 5967 6665 7445
26,351-26,400 3222 4663 5351 5977 6676 7457
26,401-26,450 3227 4671 5359 5986 6686 7469
26,451-26,500 3232 4678 5367 5995 6697 7480
26,501-26,550 3237 4686 5376 6005 6707 7492
26,551-26,600 3243 4693 5384 6014 6717 7503
26,601-26,650 3248 4701 5392 6023 6728 7515
26,651-26,700 3253 4708 5401 6032 6738 7527
26,701-26,750 3258 4716 5409 6042 6749 7538
26,751-26,800 3263 4724 5417 6051 6759 7550
26,801-26,850 3268 4731 5426 6061 6770 7562
26,851-26,900 3274 4740 5436 6072 6782 7576
26,901-26,950 3280 4749 5446 6083 6795 7590
26,951-27,000 3286 4758 5456 6095 6808 7604
27,001-27,050 3292 4767 5466 6106 6820 7618
27,051-27,100 3298 4775 5476 6117 6833 7632
27,101-27,150 3304 4784 5487 6128 6846 7646
27,151-27,200 3311 4793 5497 6140 6858 7661
27,201-27,250 3317 4802 5507 6151 6871 7675
27,251-27,300 3323 4811 5517 6162 6883 7689
27,301-27,350 3329 4819 5527 6174 6896 7703
27,351-27,400 3335 4828 5537 6185 6909 7717
27,401-27,450 3341 4837 5547 6196 6921 7731
27,451-27,500 3347 4846 5557 6207 6934 7745
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.584.9 18 1040
27,501-27,550 3353 4855 5567 6219 6946 7759
27,551-27,600 3359 4863 5577 6230 6959 7773
27,601-27,650 3365 4872 5588 6241 6972 7787
27,651-27,700 3371 4881 5598 6253 6984 7801
27,701-27,750 3377 4890 5608 6264 6997 7815
27,751-27,800 3384 4899 5618 6275 7009 7829
27,801-27,850 3390 4908 5628 6286 7022 7844
27,851-27,900 3396 4916 5638 6298 7035 7858
27,901-27,950 3402 4925 5648 6309 7047 7872
27,951-28,000 3408 4934 5658 6320 7060 7886
28,001-28,050 3414 4943 5668 6332 7072 7900
28,051-28,100 3420 4952 5679 6343 7085 7914
28,101-28,150 3426 4960 5689 6354 7098 7928
28,151-28,200 3432 4969 5699 6365 7110 7942
28,201-28,250 3438 4978 5709 6377 7123 7956
28,251-28,300 3444 4987 5719 6388 7135 7970
28,301-28,350 3451 4996 5729 6399 7148 7984
28,351-28,400 3457 5004 5739 6411 7161 7998
28,401-28,450 3463 5013 5749 6422 7173 8013
28,451-28,500 3469 5022 5759 6433 7186 8027
28,501-28,550 3475 5031 5769 6444 7198 8041
28,551-28,600 3481 5040 5780 6456 7211 8055
28,601-28,650 3487 5048 5790 6467 7224 8069
28,651-28,700 3493 5057 5800 6478 7236 8083
28,701-28,750 3499 5066 5810 6490 7249 8097
28,751-28,800 3505 5075 5820 6501 7262 8111
28,801-28,850 3511 5084 5830 6512 7274 8125
28,851-28,900 3517 5093 5840 6523 7287 8139
28,901-28,950 3524 5101 5850 6535 7299 8153
28,951-29,000 3530 5110 5860 6546 7312 8167
29,001-29,050 3536 5119 5871 6557 7325 8182
29,051-29,100 3542 5128 5881 6569 7337 8196
29,101-29,150 3548 5137 5891 6580 7350 8210
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.584.9 19 1040
29,151-29,200 3554 5145 5901 6591 7362 8224
29,201-29,250 3560 5154 5911 6602 7375 8238
29,251-29,300 3566 5163 5921 6614 7388 8252
29,301-29,350 3572 5172 5931 6625 7400 8266
29,351-29,400 3578 5181 5941 6636 7413 8280
29,401-29,450 3584 5189 5951 6648 7425 8294
29,451-29,500 3590 5198 5961 6659 7438 8308
29,501-29,550 3597 5207 5972 6670 7451 8322
29,551-29,600 3603 5216 5982 6681 7463 8336
29,601-29,650 3609 5225 5992 6693 7476 8351
29,651-29,700 3615 5234 6002 6704 7488 8365
29,701-29,750 3621 5242 6012 6715 7501 8379
29,751-29,800 3627 5251 6022 6727 7514 8393
29,801-29,850 3633 5260 6032 6738 7526 8407
29,851-29,900 3639 5269 6042 6749 7539 8421
29,901-29,950 3645 5278 6052 6761 7551 8435
29,951-30,000 3651 5286 6062 6772 7564 8449
Monthly Net One Two Three Four Five Six
Income Child Children Children Children Children Children
0-1,200 52 52 52 52 52 52
1,201-1,250 102 102 102 102 102 102
1,251-1,300 152 152 152 152 152 152
1,301-1,350 202 202 202 202 202 202
1,351-1,400 252 252 252 252 252 252
1,401-1,450 302 302 302 302 302 302
1,451-1,500 339 352 352 352 352 352
1,501-1,550 350 402 402 402 402 402
1,551-1,600 361 452 452 452 452 452
1,601-1,650 373 502 502 502 502 502
1,651-1,700 384 552 552 552 552 552
1,701-1,750 395 601 602 602 602 602
1,751-1,800 407 618 652 652 652 652
1,801-1,850 418 635 702 702 702 702
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.584.9 20 1040
1,851-1,900 429 653 752 752 752 752
1,901-1,950 440 670 802 802 802 802
1,951-2,000 452 687 829 852 852 852
2,001-2,050 463 704 850 902 902 902
2,051-2,100 474 721 871 952 952 952
2,101-2,150 485 738 890 994 1002 1002
2,151-2,200 496 754 910 1016 1052 1052
2,201-2,250 507 771 929 1038 1102 1102
2,251-2,300 518 787 949 1060 1152 1152
2,301-2,350 529 803 969 1082 1190 1202
2,351-2,400 540 820 988 1104 1214 1252
2,401-2,450 551 836 1008 1126 1238 1302
2,451-2,500 562 853 1027 1148 1262 1352
2,501-2,550 573 869 1047 1170 1287 1398
2,551-2,600 584 886 1067 1191 1311 1425
2,601-2,650 595 902 1086 1213 1335 1451
2,651-2,700 606 919 1106 1235 1359 1477
2,701-2,750 617 935 1125 1257 1383 1503
2,751-2,800 628 952 1145 1279 1407 1529
2,801-2,850 639 968 1165 1301 1431 1555
2,851-2,900 650 984 1184 1323 1455 1582
2,901-2,950 661 1001 1204 1345 1479 1608
2,951-3,000 672 1017 1223 1367 1503 1634
3,001-3,050 683 1034 1243 1388 1527 1660
3,051-3,100 693 1050 1263 1410 1551 1686
3,101-3,150 704 1067 1282 1432 1575 1713
3,151-3,200 715 1083 1302 1454 1600 1739
3,201-3,250 726 1100 1321 1476 1624 1765
3,251-3,300 737 1116 1341 1498 1648 1791
3,301-3,350 748 1133 1361 1520 1672 1817
3,351-3,400 759 1149 1380 1542 1696 1843
3,401-3,450 770 1165 1400 1564 1720 1870
3,451-3,500 781 1182 1419 1586 1744 1896
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.584.9 21 1040
3,501-3,550 792 1198 1439 1607 1768 1922
3,551-3,600 803 1215 1459 1629 1792 1948
3,601-3,650 814 1231 1478 1651 1816 1974
3,651-3,700 825 1248 1498 1673 1840 2001
3,701-3,750 836 1264 1517 1695 1864 2027
3,751-3,800 847 1281 1537 1717 1889 2053
3,801-3,850 858 1297 1557 1739 1913 2079
3,851-3,900 869 1313 1576 1761 1937 2105
3,901-3,950 880 1330 1596 1783 1961 2131
3,951-4,000 891 1346 1615 1804 1985 2158
4,001-4,050 902 1363 1635 1826 2009 2184
4,051-4,100 913 1379 1655 1848 2033 2210
4,101-4,150 924 1396 1674 1870 2057 2236
4,151-4,200 935 1412 1694 1892 2081 2262
4,201-4,250 946 1429 1713 1914 2105 2288
4,251-4,300 957 1445 1733 1936 2129 2315
4,301-4,350 968 1462 1753 1958 2153 2341
4,351-4,400 979 1478 1772 1980 2178 2367
4,401-4,450 990 1494 1792 2001 2202 2393
4,451-4,500 1000 1511 1811 2023 2226 2419
4,501-4,550 1011 1527 1831 2045 2250 2446
4,551-4,600 1022 1544 1851 2067 2274 2472
4,601-4,650 1033 1560 1870 2089 2298 2498
4,651-4,700 1044 1576 1889 2110 2322 2524
4,701-4,750 1050 1585 1899 2121 2334 2537
4,751-4,800 1056 1594 1909 2132 2346 2550
4,801-4,850 1062 1603 1919 2143 2358 2563
4,851-4,900 1069 1611 1929 2154 2370 2576
4,901-4,950 1075 1620 1939 2165 2382 2589
4,951-5,000 1081 1629 1949 2176 2394 2602
5,001-5,050 1087 1637 1958 2187 2406 2616
5,051-5,100 1093 1646 1968 2198 2418 2629
5,101-5,150 1099 1655 1978 2209 2430 2642
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.584.9 22 1040
5,151-5,200 1105 1664 1988 2220 2443 2655
5,201-5,250 1111 1672 1998 2231 2455 2668
5,251-5,300 1117 1681 2008 2242 2467 2681
5,301-5,350 1124 1690 2017 2253 2479 2694
5,351-5,400 1130 1699 2027 2264 2491 2708
5,401-5,450 1136 1707 2037 2275 2503 2721
5,451-5,500 1142 1716 2047 2286 2515 2734
5,501-5,550 1148 1725 2057 2297 2527 2747
5,551-5,600 1154 1733 2067 2308 2539 2760
5,601-5,650 1160 1742 2076 2319 2551 2773
5,651-5,700 1166 1751 2086 2330 2563 2787
5,701-5,750 1172 1759 2095 2340 2574 2798
5,751-5,800 1174 1760 2096 2341 2575 2799
5,801-5,850 1175 1762 2097 2342 2576 2800
5,851-5,900 1177 1764 2097 2343 2577 2801
5,901-5,950 1179 1765 2098 2344 2578 2803
5,951-6,000 1181 1767 2099 2345 2579 2804
6,001-6,050 1182 1769 2100 2346 2580 2805
6,051-6,100 1184 1771 2101 2347 2582 2806
6,101-6,150 1186 1772 2102 2348 2583 2807
6,151-6,200 1188 1774 2103 2349 2584 2809
6,201-6,250 1190 1776 2104 2350 2585 2810
6,251-6,300 1191 1778 2105 2351 2586 2811
6,301-6,350 1193 1779 2106 2352 2587 2812
6,351-6,400 1195 1781 2106 2353 2588 2813
6,401-6,450 1197 1783 2107 2354 2589 2815
6,451-6,500 1198 1784 2108 2355 2590 2816
6,501-6,550 1200 1786 2109 2356 2592 2817
6,551-6,600 1204 1792 2115 2362 2598 2824
6,601-6,650 1211 1802 2126 2374 2612 2839
6,651-6,700 1218 1811 2137 2387 2625 2854
6,701-6,750 1225 1821 2148 2399 2639 2869
6,751-6,800 1232 1831 2159 2411 2653 2883
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.584.9 23 1040
6,801-6,850 1239 1841 2170 2424 2666 2898
6,851-6,900 1246 1851 2181 2436 2680 2913
6,901-6,950 1253 1861 2192 2448 2693 2928
6,951-7,000 1260 1871 2203 2461 2707 2942
7,001-7,050 1267 1881 2214 2473 2720 2957
7,051-7,100 1274 1890 2225 2485 2734 2972
7,101-7,150 1281 1900 2236 2498 2748 2987
7,151-7,200 1288 1910 2247 2510 2761 3001
7,201-7,250 1295 1920 2258 2522 2775 3016
7,251-7,300 1302 1930 2269 2535 2788 3031
7,301-7,350 1309 1940 2280 2547 2802 3046
7,351-7,400 1316 1950 2291 2559 2815 3060
7,401-7,450 1323 1960 2302 2572 2829 3075
7,451-7,500 1330 1970 2313 2584 2843 3090
7,501-7,550 1337 1979 2325 2596 2856 3105
7,551-7,600 1344 1989 2336 2609 2870 3119
7,601-7,650 1350 1998 2345 2619 2881 3132
7,651-7,700 1355 2005 2353 2629 2892 3143
7,701-7,750 1360 2012 2362 2638 2902 3154
7,751-7,800 1365 2020 2370 2647 2912 3165
7,801-7,850 1370 2027 2378 2657 2922 3177
7,851-7,900 1376 2034 2387 2666 2933 3188
7,901-7,950 1381 2042 2395 2675 2943 3199
7,951-8,000 1386 2049 2403 2685 2953 3210
8,001-8,050 1391 2056 2412 2694 2963 3221
8,051-8,100 1396 2064 2420 2703 2973 3232
8,101-8,150 1401 2071 2428 2712 2984 3243
8,151-8,200 1406 2078 2437 2722 2994 3254
8,201-8,250 1411 2086 2445 2731 3004 3266
8,251-8,300 1416 2093 2453 2740 3014 3277
8,301-8,350 1421 2100 2462 2750 3025 3288
8,351-8,400 1427 2108 2470 2759 3035 3299
8,401-8,450 1432 2115 2478 2768 3045 3310
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.584.9 24 1040
8,451-8,500 1437 2122 2487 2778 3055 3321
8,501-8,550 1442 2130 2495 2787 3066 3332
8,551-8,600 1447 2137 2503 2796 3076 3343
8,601-8,650 1452 2144 2512 2806 3086 3355
8,651-8,700 1457 2152 2520 2815 3096 3366
8,701-8,750 1462 2159 2528 2824 3107 3377
8,751-8,800 1467 2166 2537 2833 3117 3388
8,801-8,850 1473 2174 2545 2843 3127 3399
8,851-8,900 1478 2181 2553 2852 3137 3410
8,901-8,950 1483 2188 2562 2861 3148 3421
8,951-9,000 1488 2196 2570 2871 3158 3433
9,001-9,050 1493 2203 2578 2880 3168 3444
9,051-9,100 1498 2210 2587 2889 3178 3455
9,101-9,150 1503 2218 2595 2899 3188 3466
9,151-9,200 1508 2225 2603 2908 3199 3477
9,201-9,250 1513 2232 2612 2917 3209 3488
9,251-9,300 1518 2240 2620 2927 3219 3499
9,301-9,350 1524 2247 2628 2936 3229 3510
9,351-9,400 1529 2254 2637 2945 3240 3522
9,401-9,450 1534 2262 2645 2954 3249 3532
9,451-9,500 1539 2269 2652 2963 3259 3543
9,501-9,550 1545 2277 2660 2972 3269 3553
9,551-9,600 1550 2284 2668 2981 3279 3564
9,601-9,650 1556 2291 2676 2989 3288 3574
9,651-9,700 1561 2299 2684 2998 3298 3585
9,701-9,750 1567 2306 2692 3007 3308 3596
9,751-9,800 1572 2314 2700 3016 3318 3606
9,801-9,850 1577 2321 2708 3025 3327 3617
9,851-9,900 1583 2328 2716 3034 3337 3627
9,901-9,950 1588 2336 2724 3042 3347 3638
9,951-10,000 1594 2343 2732 3051 3356 3648
10,001-10,050 1599 2350 2740 3060 3366 3659
10,051-10,100 1604 2358 2748 3069 3376 3670
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.584.9 25 1040
10,101-10,150 1610 2365 2756 3078 3386 3680
10,151-10,200 1615 2373 2763 3087 3395 3691
10,201-10,250 1621 2380 2771 3096 3405 3701
10,251-10,300 1626 2387 2779 3104 3415 3712
10,301-10,350 1631 2395 2787 3113 3425 3723
10,351-10,400 1637 2402 2795 3122 3434 3733
10,401-10,450 1642 2410 2803 3131 3444 3744
10,451-10,500 1648 2417 2811 3140 3454 3754
10,501-10,550 1653 2424 2819 3149 3464 3765
10,551-10,600 1658 2432 2827 3158 3473 3775
10,601-10,650 1664 2439 2835 3166 3483 3786
10,651-10,700 1669 2447 2843 3175 3493 3797
10,701-10,750 1675 2454 2851 3184 3503 3807
10,751-10,800 1680 2461 2859 3193 3512 3818
10,801-10,850 1686 2469 2866 3202 3522 3828
10,851-10,900 1691 2476 2874 3211 3532 3839
10,901-10,950 1696 2484 2882 3220 3541 3850
10,951-11,000 1702 2491 2890 3228 3551 3860
11,001-11,050 1707 2498 2898 3237 3561 3871
11,051-11,100 1713 2506 2906 3246 3571 3881
11,101-11,150 1718 2513 2914 3255 3580 3892
11,151-11,200 1723 2521 2922 3264 3590 3902
11,201-11,250 1729 2528 2930 3273 3600 3913
11,251-11,300 1734 2535 2938 3281 3610 3924
11,301-11,350 1740 2543 2946 3290 3619 3934
11,351-11,400 1745 2550 2954 3299 3629 3945
11,401-11,450 1750 2558 2962 3308 3639 3955
11,451-11,500 1756 2565 2970 3317 3649 3967
11,501-11,550 1760 2572 2979 3328 3661 3979
11,551-11,600 1765 2580 2989 3339 3672 3992
11,601-11,650 1770 2587 2998 3349 3684 4005
11,651-11,700 1774 2595 3008 3360 3696 4017
11,701-11,750 1779 2602 3017 3370 3707 4030
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.584.9 26 1040
11,751-11,800 1784 2610 3027 3381 3719 4042
11,801-11,850 1788 2617 3036 3391 3730 4055
11,851-11,900 1793 2625 3046 3402 3742 4068
11,901-11,950 1797 2632 3055 3412 3754 4080
11,951-12,000 1802 2639 3064 3423 3765 4093
12,001-12,050 1807 2647 3074 3434 3777 4105
12,051-12,100 1811 2654 3083 3444 3788 4118
12,101-12,150 1816 2662 3093 3455 3800 4131
12,151-12,200 1821 2669 3102 3465 3812 4143
12,201-12,250 1825 2677 3112 3476 3823 4156
12,251-12,300 1830 2684 3121 3486 3835 4169
12,301-12,350 1835 2692 3131 3497 3847 4181
12,351-12,400 1839 2699 3140 3507 3858 4194
12,401-12,450 1844 2706 3149 3518 3870 4206
12,451-12,500 1849 2714 3159 3529 3881 4219
12,501-12,550 1853 2721 3168 3539 3893 4232
12,551-12,600 1858 2729 3178 3550 3905 4244
12,601-12,650 1863 2736 3187 3560 3916 4257
12,651-12,700 1867 2744 3197 3571 3928 4270
12,701-12,750 1872 2751 3206 3581 3939 4282
12,751-12,800 1877 2759 3216 3592 3951 4295
12,801-12,850 1881 2766 3225 3602 3963 4307
12,851-12,900 1886 2773 3235 3613 3974 4320
12,901-12,950 1890 2781 3244 3624 3986 4333
12,951-13,000 1895 2788 3253 3634 3997 4345
13,001-13,050 1900 2796 3263 3645 4009 4358
13,051-13,100 1904 2803 3272 3655 4021 4370
13,101-13,150 1909 2811 3282 3666 4032 4383
13,151-13,200 1914 2818 3291 3676 4044 4396
13,201-13,250 1918 2826 3301 3687 4056 4408
13,251-13,300 1923 2833 3310 3697 4067 4421
13,301-13,350 1928 2840 3320 3708 4079 4434
13,351-13,400 1932 2848 3329 3718 4090 4446
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.584.9 27 1040
13,401-13,450 1937 2855 3338 3729 4102 4459
13,451-13,500 1942 2863 3348 3740 4114 4471
13,501-13,550 1946 2870 3357 3750 4125 4484
13,551-13,600 1951 2878 3367 3761 4137 4497
13,601-13,650 1956 2885 3376 3771 4148 4509
13,651-13,700 1960 2893 3386 3782 4160 4522
13,701-13,750 1965 2900 3395 3792 4172 4535
13,751-13,800 1970 2907 3405 3803 4183 4547
13,801-13,850 1974 2915 3414 3813 4195 4560
13,851-13,900 1979 2922 3423 3824 4206 4572
13,901-13,950 1983 2930 3433 3835 4218 4585
13,951-14,000 1988 2937 3442 3845 4230 4598
14,001-14,050 1993 2945 3452 3856 4241 4610
14,051-14,100 1997 2952 3461 3866 4253 4623
14,101-14,150 2002 2960 3471 3877 4264 4636
14,151-14,200 2007 2967 3480 3887 4276 4648
14,201-14,250 2011 2974 3490 3898 4288 4661
14,251-14,300 2016 2982 3499 3908 4299 4673
14,301-14,350 2021 2989 3509 3919 4311 4686
14,351-14,400 2025 2997 3518 3930 4323 4699
14,401-14,450 2030 3004 3527 3940 4334 4711
14,451-14,500 2035 3012 3537 3951 4346 4724
14,501-14,550 2039 3019 3546 3961 4357 4736
14,551-14,600 2044 3027 3556 3972 4369 4749
14,601-14,650 2049 3034 3565 3982 4380 4762
14,651-14,700 2055 3043 3574 3993 4392 4774
14,701-14,750 2060 3051 3584 4003 4403 4786
14,751-14,800 2066 3059 3593 4013 4415 4799
14,801-14,850 2072 3067 3602 4024 4426 4811
14,851-14,900 2077 3075 3612 4034 4437 4824
14,901-14,950 2083 3083 3621 4044 4449 4836
14,951-15,000 2089 3091 3630 4055 4460 4848
15,001-15,050 2094 3099 3639 4065 4472 4861
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.584.9 28 1040
15,051-15,100 2100 3107 3649 4076 4483 4873
15,101-15,150 2105 3116 3658 4086 4495 4886
15,151-15,200 2111 3124 3667 4096 4506 4898
15,201-15,250 2117 3132 3677 4107 4517 4910
15,251-15,300 2122 3140 3686 4117 4529 4923
15,301-15,350 2128 3148 3695 4127 4540 4935
15,351-15,400 2133 3156 3704 4138 4552 4948
15,401-15,450 2139 3164 3714 4148 4563 4960
15,451-15,500 2145 3172 3723 4159 4574 4972
15,501-15,550 2150 3180 3732 4169 4586 4985
15,551-15,600 2156 3189 3742 4179 4597 4997
15,601-15,650 2161 3197 3751 4190 4609 5010
15,651-15,700 2167 3205 3760 4200 4620 5022
15,701-15,750 2173 3213 3769 4210 4631 5034
15,751-15,800 2178 3221 3779 4221 4643 5047
15,801-15,850 2184 3229 3788 4231 4654 5059
15,851-15,900 2190 3237 3797 4242 4666 5072
15,901-15,950 2195 3245 3807 4252 4677 5084
15,951-16,000 2201 3253 3816 4262 4688 5096
16,001-16,050 2206 3261 3825 4273 4700 5109
16,051-16,100 2212 3270 3834 4283 4711 5121
16,101-16,150 2218 3278 3844 4293 4723 5134
16,151-16,200 2223 3286 3853 4304 4734 5146
16,201-16,250 2229 3294 3862 4314 4746 5158
16,251-16,300 2234 3302 3872 4324 4757 5171
16,301-16,350 2240 3310 3881 4335 4768 5183
16,351-16,400 2246 3318 3890 4345 4780 5196
16,401-16,450 2251 3326 3899 4356 4791 5208
16,451-16,500 2257 3334 3909 4366 4803 5220
16,501-16,550 2262 3343 3918 4376 4814 5233
16,551-16,600 2268 3351 3927 4387 4825 5245
16,601-16,650 2274 3359 3937 4397 4837 5258
16,651-16,700 2279 3367 3946 4407 4848 5270
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.584.9 29 1040
16,701-16,750 2285 3375 3955 4418 4860 5282
16,751-16,800 2291 3383 3964 4428 4871 5295
16,801-16,850 2296 3391 3974 4439 4882 5307
16,851-16,900 2302 3399 3983 4449 4894 5320
16,901-16,950 2307 3407 3992 4459 4905 5332
16,951-17,000 2313 3416 4001 4470 4917 5344
17,001-17,050 2319 3424 4011 4480 4928 5357
17,051-17,100 2324 3432 4020 4490 4939 5369
17,101-17,150 2330 3440 4029 4501 4951 5382
17,151-17,200 2335 3448 4039 4511 4962 5394
17,201-17,250 2341 3456 4048 4522 4974 5406
17,251-17,300 2347 3464 4057 4532 4985 5419
17,301-17,350 2352 3472 4066 4542 4996 5431
17,351-17,400 2358 3480 4076 4553 5008 5444
17,401-17,450 2363 3489 4085 4563 5019 5456
17,451-17,500 2369 3497 4094 4573 5031 5468
17,501-17,550 2375 3505 4104 4584 5042 5481
17,551-17,600 2380 3513 4113 4594 5054 5493
17,601-17,650 2386 3521 4122 4604 5065 5506
17,651-17,700 2392 3529 4131 4615 5076 5518
17,701-17,750 2397 3537 4141 4625 5088 5530
17,751-17,800 2403 3545 4150 4636 5099 5543
17,801-17,850 2408 3553 4159 4646 5111 5555
17,851-17,900 2414 3562 4169 4656 5122 5568
17,901-17,950 2420 3570 4178 4667 5133 5580
17,951-18,000 2425 3578 4187 4677 5145 5592
18,001-18,050 2431 3586 4196 4687 5156 5605
18,051-18,100 2436 3594 4206 4698 5168 5617
18,101-18,150 2442 3602 4215 4708 5179 5630
18,151-18,200 2448 3610 4224 4719 5190 5642
18,201-18,250 2453 3618 4234 4729 5202 5654
18,251-18,300 2459 3626 4243 4739 5213 5667
18,301-18,350 2465 3635 4252 4750 5225 5679
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.584.9 30 1040
18,351-18,400 2470 3643 4261 4760 5236 5692
18,401-18,450 2476 3651 4271 4770 5247 5704
18,451-18,500 2481 3659 4280 4781 5259 5716
18,501-18,550 2487 3667 4289 4791 5270 5729
18,551-18,600 2493 3675 4299 4802 5282 5741
18,601-18,650 2498 3683 4308 4812 5293 5754
18,651-18,700 2504 3691 4317 4822 5305 5766
18,701-18,750 2509 3699 4326 4833 5316 5778
18,751-18,800 2515 3708 4336 4843 5327 5791
18,801-18,850 2521 3716 4345 4853 5339 5803
18,851-18,900 2526 3724 4354 4864 5350 5816
18,901-18,950 2532 3732 4364 4874 5362 5828
18,951-19,000 2537 3740 4373 4885 5373 5840
19,001-19,050 2543 3748 4382 4895 5384 5853
19,051-19,100 2549 3756 4391 4905 5396 5865
19,101-19,150 2554 3764 4401 4916 5407 5878
19,151-19,200 2560 3772 4410 4926 5419 5890
19,201-19,250 2566 3781 4419 4936 5430 5902
19,251-19,300 2571 3789 4429 4947 5441 5915
19,301-19,350 2577 3797 4438 4957 5453 5927
19,351-19,400 2582 3805 4447 4967 5464 5940
19,401-19,450 2588 3813 4456 4978 5476 5952
19,451-19,500 2594 3821 4466 4988 5487 5964
19,501-19,550 2599 3829 4475 4999 5498 5977
19,551-19,600 2605 3837 4484 5009 5510 5989
19,601-19,650 2610 3845 4494 5019 5521 6002
19,651-19,700 2616 3854 4503 5030 5533 6014
19,701-19,750 2622 3862 4512 5040 5544 6026
19,751-19,800 2627 3870 4521 5050 5555 6039
19,801-19,850 2633 3878 4531 5061 5567 6051
19,851-19,900 2638 3886 4540 5071 5578 6064
19,901-19,950 2644 3894 4549 5082 5590 6076
19,951-20,000 2650 3902 4559 5092 5601 6088
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.584.9 31 1040
20,001-20,050 2655 3910 4568 5102 5613 6101
20,051-20,100 2661 3918 4577 5113 5624 6113
20,101-20,150 2667 3926 4586 5123 5635 6126
20,151-20,200 2672 3935 4596 5133 5647 6138
20,201-20,250 2678 3943 4605 5144 5658 6150
20,251-20,300 2683 3951 4614 5154 5670 6163
20,301-20,350 2689 3959 4624 5165 5681 6175
20,351-20,400 2695 3967 4633 5175 5692 6188
20,401-20,450 2700 3975 4642 5185 5704 6200
20,451-20,500 2706 3983 4651 5196 5715 6212
20,501-20,550 2711 3991 4661 5206 5727 6225
20,551-20,600 2717 3999 4670 5216 5738 6237
20,601-20,650 2723 4008 4679 5227 5749 6250
20,651-20,700 2728 4016 4689 5237 5761 6262
20,701-20,750 2734 4024 4698 5247 5772 6274
20,751-20,800 2739 4032 4707 5258 5784 6287
20,801-20,850 2745 4040 4716 5268 5795 6299
20,851-20,900 2751 4048 4726 5279 5806 6312
20,901-20,950 2756 4056 4735 5289 5818 6324
20,951-21,000 2762 4064 4744 5299 5829 6336
21,001-21,050 2768 4072 4754 5310 5841 6349
21,051-21,100 2773 4081 4763 5320 5852 6361
21,101-21,150 2779 4089 4772 5330 5864 6374
21,151-21,200 2784 4097 4781 5341 5875 6386
21,201-21,250 2790 4105 4791 5351 5886 6398
21,251-21,300 2796 4113 4800 5362 5898 6411
21,301-21,350 2801 4121 4809 5372 5909 6423
21,351-21,400 2807 4129 4819 5382 5921 6436
21,401-21,450 2812 4137 4828 5393 5932 6448
21,451-21,500 2818 4145 4837 5403 5943 6460
21,501-21,550 2824 4154 4846 5413 5955 6473
21,551-21,600 2829 4162 4856 5424 5966 6485
21,601-21,650 2835 4170 4865 5434 5978 6498
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.584.9 32 1040
21,651-21,700 2840 4178 4874 5445 5989 6510
21,701-21,750 2846 4186 4884 5455 6000 6522
21,751-21,800 2852 4194 4893 5465 6012 6535
21,801-21,850 2857 4202 4902 5476 6023 6547
21,851-21,900 2863 4210 4911 5486 6035 6560
21,901-21,950 2869 4218 4921 5496 6046 6572
21,951-22,000 2874 4227 4930 5507 6057 6584
22,001-22,050 2880 4235 4939 5517 6069 6597
22,051-22,100 2885 4243 4949 5528 6080 6609
22,101-22,150 2891 4251 4958 5538 6092 6622
22,151-22,200 2897 4259 4967 5548 6103 6634
22,201-22,250 2902 4267 4976 5559 6114 6646
22,251-22,300 2908 4275 4986 5569 6126 6659
22,301-22,350 2913 4283 4995 5579 6137 6671
22,351-22,400 2919 4291 5004 5590 6149 6684
22,401-22,450 2925 4300 5014 5600 6160 6696
22,451-22,500 2930 4308 5023 5610 6172 6708
22,501-22,550 2936 4316 5032 5621 6183 6721
22,551-22,600 2941 4324 5041 5631 6194 6733
22,601-22,650 2947 4332 5051 5642 6206 6746
22,651-22,700 2953 4340 5060 5652 6217 6758
22,701-22,750 2958 4348 5069 5662 6229 6770
22,751-22,800 2964 4356 5079 5673 6240 6783
22,801-22,850 2970 4364 5088 5683 6251 6795
22,851-22,900 2975 4373 5097 5693 6263 6808
22,901-22,950 2981 4381 5106 5704 6274 6820
22,951-23,000 2986 4389 5116 5714 6286 6832
23,001-23,050 2992 4397 5125 5725 6297 6845
23,051-23,100 2998 4405 5134 5735 6308 6857
23,101-23,150 3003 4413 5144 5745 6320 6870
23,151-23,200 3009 4421 5153 5756 6331 6882
23,201-23,250 3014 4429 5162 5766 6343 6894
23,251-23,300 3020 4437 5171 5776 6354 6907
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.584.9 33 1040
23,301-23,350 3026 4446 5181 5787 6365 6919
23,351-23,400 3031 4454 5190 5797 6377 6932
23,401-23,450 3037 4462 5199 5808 6388 6944
23,451-23,500 3042 4470 5209 5818 6400 6956
23,501-23,550 3048 4478 5218 5828 6411 6969
23,551-23,600 3054 4486 5227 5839 6423 6981
23,601-23,650 3059 4494 5236 5849 6434 6994
23,651-23,700 3065 4502 5246 5859 6445 7006
23,701-23,750 3071 4510 5255 5870 6457 7018
23,751-23,800 3076 4518 5264 5880 6468 7031
23,801-23,850 3082 4527 5274 5891 6480 7043
23,851-23,900 3087 4535 5283 5901 6491 7056
23,901-23,950 3093 4543 5292 5911 6502 7068
23,951-24,000 3099 4551 5301 5922 6514 7080
24,001-24,050 3104 4559 5311 5932 6525 7093
24,051-24,100 3110 4567 5320 5942 6537 7105
24,101-24,150 3115 4575 5329 5953 6548 7118
24,151-24,200 3121 4583 5338 5963 6559 7130
24,201-24,250 3127 4591 5348 5973 6571 7142
24,251-24,300 3132 4600 5357 5984 6582 7155
24,301-24,350 3138 4608 5366 5994 6594 7167
24,351-24,400 3144 4616 5376 6005 6605 7180
24,401-24,450 3149 4624 5385 6015 6616 7192
24,451-24,500 3155 4632 5394 6025 6628 7204
24,501-24,550 3160 4640 5403 6036 6639 7217
24,551-24,600 3166 4648 5413 6046 6651 7229
24,601-24,650 3172 4656 5422 6056 6662 7242
24,651-24,700 3177 4664 5431 6067 6673 7254
24,701-24,750 3183 4673 5441 6077 6685 7266
24,751-24,800 3188 4681 5450 6088 6696 7279
24,801-24,850 3194 4689 5459 6098 6708 7291
24,851-24,900 3200 4697 5468 6108 6719 7304
24,901-24,950 3205 4705 5478 6119 6731 7316
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.584.9 34 1040
24,951-25,000 3211 4713 5487 6129 6742 7328
25,001-25,050 3216 4721 5496 6139 6753 7341
25,051-25,100 3222 4729 5506 6150 6765 7353
25,101-25,150 3228 4737 5515 6160 6776 7366
25,151-25,200 3233 4746 5524 6171 6788 7378
25,201-25,250 3239 4754 5533 6181 6799 7390
25,251-25,300 3245 4762 5543 6191 6810 7403
25,301-25,350 3250 4770 5552 6202 6822 7415
25,351-25,400 3256 4778 5561 6212 6833 7428
25,401-25,450 3261 4786 5571 6222 6845 7440
25,451-25,500 3267 4794 5580 6233 6856 7452
25,501-25,550 3273 4802 5589 6243 6867 7465
25,551-25,600 3278 4810 5598 6253 6879 7477
25,601-25,650 3284 4819 5608 6264 6890 7490
25,651-25,700 3289 4827 5617 6274 6902 7502
25,701-25,750 3295 4835 5626 6285 6913 7514
25,751-25,800 3301 4843 5636 6295 6924 7527
25,801-25,850 3306 4851 5645 6305 6936 7539
25,851-25,900 3312 4859 5654 6316 6947 7552
25,901-25,950 3317 4867 5663 6326 6959 7564
25,951-26,000 3323 4875 5673 6336 6970 7576
26,001-26,050 3329 4883 5682 6347 6982 7589
26,051-26,100 3334 4892 5691 6357 6993 7601
26,101-26,150 3340 4900 5701 6368 7004 7614
26,151-26,200 3346 4908 5710 6378 7016 7626
26,201-26,250 3351 4916 5719 6388 7027 7639
26,251-26,300 3357 4924 5728 6399 7039 7651
26,301-26,350 3362 4932 5738 6409 7050 7663
26,351-26,400 3368 4940 5747 6419 7061 7676
26,401-26,450 3374 4948 5756 6430 7073 7688
26,451-26,500 3379 4956 5766 6440 7084 7701
26,501-26,550 3385 4965 5775 6451 7096 7713
26,551-26,600 3390 4973 5784 6461 7107 7725
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.584.9 35 1040
26,601-26,650 3396 4981 5793 6471 7118 7738
26,651-26,700 3402 4989 5803 6482 7130 7750
26,701-26,750 3407 4997 5812 6492 7141 7763
26,751-26,800 3413 5005 5821 6502 7153 7775
26,801-26,850 3418 5013 5831 6513 7164 7787
26,851-26,900 3424 5021 5840 6523 7175 7800
26,901-26,950 3430 5029 5849 6534 7187 7812
26,951-27,000 3435 5038 5858 6544 7198 7825
27,001-27,050 3441 5046 5868 6554 7210 7837
27,051-27,100 3447 5054 5877 6565 7221 7849
27,101-27,150 3452 5062 5886 6575 7232 7862
27,151-27,200 3458 5070 5896 6585 7244 7874
27,201-27,250 3463 5078 5905 6596 7255 7887
27,251-27,300 3469 5086 5914 6606 7267 7899
27,301-27,350 3475 5094 5923 6616 7278 7911
27,351-27,400 3480 5102 5933 6627 7290 7924
27,401-27,450 3486 5111 5942 6637 7301 7936
27,451-27,500 3491 5119 5951 6648 7312 7949
27,501-27,550 3497 5127 5961 6658 7324 7961
27,551-27,600 3503 5135 5970 6668 7335 7973
27,601-27,650 3508 5143 5979 6679 7347 7986
27,651-27,700 3514 5151 5988 6689 7358 7998
27,701-27,750 3519 5159 5998 6699 7369 8011
27,751-27,800 3525 5167 6007 6710 7381 8023
27,801-27,850 3531 5175 6016 6720 7392 8035
27,851-27,900 3536 5183 6026 6731 7404 8048
27,901-27,950 3542 5192 6035 6741 7415 8060
27,951-28,000 3548 5200 6044 6751 7426 8073
28,001-28,050 3553 5208 6053 6762 7438 8085
28,051-28,100 3559 5216 6063 6772 7449 8097
28,101-28,150 3564 5224 6072 6782 7461 8110
28,151-28,200 3570 5232 6081 6793 7472 8122
28,201-28,250 3576 5241 6092 6804 7485 8136
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.584.9 36 1040
28,251-28,300 3582 5250 6102 6816 7498 8150
28,301-28,350 3589 5260 6113 6828 7511 8165
28,351-28,400 3595 5269 6124 6840 7524 8179
28,401-28,450 3601 5278 6135 6852 7538 8193
28,451-28,500 3608 5287 6145 6865 7551 8208
28,501-28,550 3614 5297 6156 6877 7564 8222
28,551-28,600 3620 5306 6167 6889 7577 8237
28,601-28,650 3627 5315 6178 6901 7591 8251
28,651-28,700 3633 5325 6189 6913 7604 8265
28,701-28,750 3639 5334 6199 6925 7617 8280
28,751-28,800 3646 5343 6210 6937 7630 8294
28,801-28,850 3652 5352 6221 6949 7644 8309
28,851-28,900 3658 5362 6232 6961 7657 8323
28,901-28,950 3665 5371 6243 6973 7670 8337
28,951-29,000 3671 5380 6253 6985 7683 8352
29,001-29,050 3677 5389 6264 6997 7697 8366
29,051-29,100 3684 5399 6275 7009 7710 8381
29,101-29,150 3690 5408 6286 7021 7723 8395
29,151-29,200 3696 5417 6296 7033 7736 8409
29,201-29,250 3703 5427 6307 7045 7750 8424
29,251-29,300 3709 5436 6318 7057 7763 8438
29,301-29,350 3715 5445 6329 7069 7776 8453
29,351-29,400 3722 5454 6340 7081 7789 8467
29,401-29,450 3728 5464 6350 7093 7803 8481
29,451-29,500 3734 5473 6361 7105 7816 8496
29,501-29,550 3741 5482 6372 7117 7829 8510
29,551-29,600 3747 5491 6383 7129 7842 8525
29,601-29,650 3753 5501 6393 7141 7856 8539
29,651-29,700 3760 5510 6404 7154 7869 8553
29,701-29,750 3766 5519 6415 7166 7882 8568
29,751-29,800 3772 5529 6426 7178 7895 8582
29,801-29,850 3779 5538 6437 7190 7909 8597
29,851-29,900 3785 5547 6447 7202 7922 8611
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.584.9 37 1040
29,901-29,950 3791 5556 6458 7214 7935 8625
29,951-30,000 3798 5566 6469 7226 7948 8640
The share of the custodial parent is presumed to be spent directly for the benefit of the
child.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.